Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 4. DNA Identification Record System

§ 7-19-401.
Definitions.

For purposes of this act:

“CODIS” means the FBI’s national DNA identification index system;

“Convicted” includes pleas of guilty, nolo contendere and verdicts of guilty upon which a judgment of conviction may be rendered. “Convicted” shall not include dispositions pursuant to W.S.

7-13-301

or

35-7-1037

;

“Criminal justice agency” means any agency or institution of state or local government, other than the office of the public defender, which performs as part of its principal function, activities relating to:

The apprehension, investigation, prosecution, adjudication, incarceration, supervision or rehabilitation of criminal offenders; or

The collection, maintenance, storage, dissemination or use of criminal history record information.

“Department” means the Wyoming department of corrections;

“Division” means the division of criminal investigation within the office of the Wyoming attorney general;

“DNA” means deoxyribonucleic acid located in the cells;

“DNA record” means DNA identification information stored in the state DNA database or CODIS for the purposes of generating investigative leads or supporting statistical interpretation of DNA test results. The objective form of DNA analysis test including numerical representation of DNA fragment lengths, the digital image of autoradiographs and discrete allele assignment numbers of a DNA sample, together with the identity of the submitting agency shall be stored as a DNA record in the state DNA database;

“DNA sample” means a human tissue sample containing DNA which may include, but is not limited to, blood, hair and buccal cells;

“FBI” means the federal bureau of investigation;

“In custody” means imprisoned in the Wyoming state penitentiary, state penitentiary farms and camps or Wyoming women’s center, committed to the Wyoming boys’ school pursuant to W.S.

7-13-101

, or on probation or parole;

“State DNA database” means the DNA identification record system established under this act;

“Sexual assault biological evidence” includes DNA samples and evidence gathered during an examination conducted under W.S.

6-2-309

;

“This act” means W.S.

7-19-401

through

7-19-407

.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 139, § 1; 2019 ch. 76, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added (a)(xii), redesignated existing (a)(xii) as (a)(xiii), and substituted "7-19-407" for "7-19-406."

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 7-19-402.
DNA database created; uses of information restricted.

The division shall establish a state DNA database for convicted felons, crime scene specimens and close biological relatives of missing persons in accordance with the provisions of this act. The state DNA database shall be used to assist federal, state and local criminal justice agencies in the putative identification, detection or exclusion of individuals who are subjects of a prosecution of a crime involving biological evidence from the crime scene. The database may also be used:

To support development of a population statistics database, when personal identifying information is removed;

To support identification research and protocol development of forensic DNA analysis methods;

For quality control purposes; and

To assist in the recovery or identification of human remains from mass disasters or for other humanitarian purposes, including identification of living missing persons.

DNA samples collected and stored for the state DNA database shall not be used or disseminated for purposes other than those specified in this act.

The state DNA database, including test procedures, laboratory equipment, supplies and computer software shall be compatible with that utilized by the FBI. Local criminal justice agencies that establish or operate a DNA identification record system shall ensure that such system is compatible with the state DNA database and that the local system is equipped to receive and answer inquiries from the state DNA database and transmit DNA records to the state DNA database. Procedures and rules for the collection, analysis, storage, expungement and use of DNA identification data shall be uniform throughout the state DNA database.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 139, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-19-401(a)(xii).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and operation of state DNA database statutes, 76 ALR5th 239.

§ 7-19-403.
DNA samples required; collection; testing; reimbursement of costs.

Every person convicted of a felony on or after July 1, 1997, and every person who on or after July 1, 1997, is in custody in this state as a result of a felony conviction shall provide a DNA sample for analysis to determine identification characteristics specific to the person. The DNA record resulting from the DNA analysis shall be stored and maintained by the division in the state DNA database.

DNA samples shall be collected in a medically approved manner by a physician, registered nurse, qualified clinical or laboratory technician or other person qualified by training and experience. Persons authorized to draw or collect DNA samples under this section shall not be civilly liable for such acts when acting in a reasonable manner according to generally accepted medical practices. DNA samples required under this section for persons in custody on or after July 1, 1997, shall be provided prior to release from custody. DNA samples required under this section for persons convicted on or after July 1, 1997, and not sentenced to imprisonment shall be provided as a condition of the sentence immediately after sentencing. The division shall promulgate rules and regulations governing the policies and procedures for the collection of DNA samples and transfer of DNA samples to the division. Criminal justice agencies having custody of a person required to provide a DNA sample under this section shall comply with rules and regulations of the division relating to the collection of DNA samples and transfer of such DNA samples for analysis.

DNA samples collected under this section shall be transmitted to the division for the state DNA database. The division shall perform tests on the DNA samples as necessary to implement the purposes of the state DNA database as specified in W.S. 7-19-402(a). The division may contract for services to perform DNA typing under this subsection. The division shall ensure that:

Any contractor conducts forensic DNA analysis in accordance with national standards for DNA quality assurance and proficiency testing issued pursuant to the Federal DNA Identification Act of 1994; and

Typing results meet acceptance criteria established by the FBI for inclusion of DNA records in CODIS.

The division shall reimburse any Wyoming city, town, county or agency required to collect DNA samples under this act for the cost of collecting the sample. The procedure for reimbursement shall be in accordance with rules adopted by the division.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 139, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-19-401(a)(xii).

Constitutionality. —

The DNA Identification Act's purpose in collecting DNA identification information to advance the legitimate state interest in criminal law enforcement does not violate the Fourth Amendment, because collecting DNA samples either from blood, saliva, or hair, through routine, unobtrusive procedures is minimally intrusive, and convicted felons have diminished privacy rights. Doles v. State, 994 P.2d 315,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1999).

§ 7-19-404.
Access to database; information authorized to be stored.

The division shall authorize access to or disclose DNA records and DNA samples collected in the state DNA database only in the following circumstances:

To criminal justice agencies for law enforcement identification purposes;

For criminal defense purposes, to a defendant who shall have access to samples and analyses performed in connection with the case in which such defendant is charged;

For a population statistics database, identification research and protocol development or quality control purpose, and then only if personal identifying information is removed; and

To assist in the recovery or identification of human remains from mass disasters or for other humanitarian purposes, including identification of living missing persons.

Access to the state DNA database shall be limited to duly constituted federal, state and local criminal justice agencies through their servicing forensic DNA laboratories. The division shall allow access to defendants for criminal defense purposes as defined in paragraph (a)(ii) of this section upon court order. The division shall adopt rules and procedures to ensure the state DNA database is protected against unauthorized access to the system or files containing DNA related information.

Only DNA records which directly relate to the identification characteristics of individuals shall be collected and stored in the state DNA database. The information contained in the state DNA database shall not be collected or stored for the purpose of obtaining information about physical characteristics, traits or predisposition for disease and shall not serve any purpose other than those stated in W.S. 7-19-402(a). The submitting agency may maintain control of the DNA records it develops.

Any person who, by virtue of employment or official position, has possession of or access to, a DNA record and willfully discloses it in any manner to any person or agency not entitled to receive the record is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both. Any person who, without authorization, willfully obtains or attempts to obtain any DNA record, or tampers with or attempts to tamper with any DNA sample, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 139, § 1.

Stated

in

Doles v. State, 994 P.2d 315,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1999).

§ 7-19-405.
Expungement of information.

Any person whose DNA profile has been included in the state DNA database pursuant to this act may request expungement on the grounds the felony conviction on which the authority for including the DNA profile was based has been reversed and dismissed. The division shall expunge all identifiable information and DNA records in the state DNA database relating to the subject conviction from the person upon receipt of:

A written request for expungement pursuant to this section; and

A certified copy of the court order reversing and dismissing the conviction or providing for expungement.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 139, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-19-401(a)(xii).

§ 7-19-406.
Enforcement.

Duly authorized law enforcement and corrections personnel may employ reasonable force in cases where a person refuses to submit to DNA testing as required under this act, and no such employee shall be criminally or civilly liable for the use of such reasonable force. If a person required to provide a DNA sample under this act refuses to do so, the criminal justice agency having custody of the person may apply to the district court for an order requiring the person to provide the sample in conformity with the provisions of this act. Refusal to provide the sample shall be punishable as contempt of the court.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 139, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-19-401(a)(xii).

§ 7-19-407.
Sexual assault biological evidence reports.

Beginning January 1, 2020, each criminal justice agency shall report to the division all investigations in which sexual assault biological evidence is gathered. The report shall include the type of crime involved, whether the evidence was submitted to a laboratory for analysis, the name of the lab, whether lab analysis has been completed, and if not submitted, the reasons for nonsubmission and any other information required by the division. Reports shall not include the names of any of the persons involved in an incident or any information which would serve to identify any individual person.

At least annually, the division shall compile a statistical report that shall include the information received pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. Copies of the statistical report shall be published in the “Uniform Crime Reporting, Crime in Wyoming” publication and shall be made available to the public upon request.

History.

2019 ch. 76, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 76 § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.